Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.058

Fines, administrative fees, costs, and surcharges prohibited.

No fine, administrative fee, cost, or surcharge may be imposed or collected by the court or any agent of the court against any juvenile or a juvenile's parent or guardian, or other person having custody of the juvenile, in connection with any juvenile offender proceeding including, but not limited to, fees for diversion, DNA sampling, or victims' penalty assessments.

[ 2023 c 449 s 14.]

NOTES:

Application—2023 c 449: "Nothing in this act requires a court to refund or reimburse amounts previously paid towards legal financial obligations, interests on legal financial obligations, or any other costs." [ 2023 c 449 s 22.]

Effective date—2023 c 449: "Except for section 15 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 449 s 27.]